Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB87.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 66.480 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The governing body of a city, county, urban-county, charter county, school district
(provided that its general procedure for action is approved by the Kentucky Board
of Education), or other local governmental unit or political subdivision, may invest
and reinvest money subject to its control and jurisdiction in:
(a) 1. Obligations of the United States and of its agencies and
instrumentalities, including obligations subject to repurchase
agreements, if delivery of these obligations subject to repurchase
agreements is taken either directly or through an authorized custodian.
2. These investments may be accomplished through repurchase agreements
reached with sources including but not limited to:
a. National or state banks chartered in Kentucky; and
b. State or federally chartered credit unions having a physical
presence in Kentucky;
(b) Obligations and contracts for future delivery or purchase of obligations
backed by the full faith and credit of the United States or a United States
government agency, including but not limited to:
1. United States Treasury;
2. Export-Import Bank of the United States;
3. Farmers Home Administration;
4. Government National Mortgage Corporation; and
5. Merchant Marine bonds;
(c) Obligations of any corporation of the United States government, including but
not limited to:
Page 1 of 17
XXXX 1/13/2026 4:18 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1394
1. Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corporation;
2. Federal Farm Credit Banks;
3. Bank for Cooperatives;
4. Federal Intermediate Credit Banks;
5. Federal Land Banks;
6. Federal Home Loan Banks;
7. Federal National Mortgage Association; and
8. Tennessee Valley Authority;
(d) Certificates of deposit or other interest-bearing accounts issued through a
bank,[ or] savings and loan institution, or credit union, having a physical
presence in Kentucky which are:
1. Insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, the National
Credit Union Administration, or a similar entity; or[ which are ]
2. Collateralized, to the extent uninsured, by any obligations, including
surety bonds, permitted by KRS 41.240(4);
(e) Uncollateralized certificates of deposit issued by any bank, [or ]savings and
loan institution, or credit union, having a physical presence in Kentucky rated
in one (1) of the three (3) highest categories by a competent rating agency;
(f) Bankers' acceptances for banks rated in one (1) of the three (3) highest
categories by a competent rating agency;
(g) Commercial paper rated in the highest category by a competent rating agency;
(h) Bonds or certificates of indebtedness of this state and of its agencies and
instrumentalities;
(i) Securities issued by a state or local government, or any instrumentality of
agency thereof, in the United States, and rated in one (1) of the three (3)
highest categories by a competent rating agency;
(j) Shares of mutual funds and exchange traded funds, each of which shall have
Page 2 of 17
XXXX 1/13/2026 4:18 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1394
the following characteristics:
1. The mutual fund shall be an open-end diversified investment company
registered under the Federal Investment Company Act of 1940, as
amended;
2. The management company of the investment company shall have been
in operation for at least five (5) years; and
3. All of the securities in the mutual fund shall be eligible investments
pursuant to this section;
(k) Individual equity securities if the funds being invested are managed by a
professional investment manager regulated by a federal regulatory agency.
The individual equity securities shall be included within the Standard and
Poor's 500 Index, and a single sector shall not exceed twenty-five percent
(25%) of the equity allocation; and
(l) Individual high-quality corporate bonds that are managed by a professional
investment manager that:
1. Are issued, assumed, or guaranteed by a solvent institution created and
existing under the laws of the United States;
2. Have a standard maturity of no more than ten (10) years; and
3. Are rated in the three (3) highest rating categories by at least two (2)
competent credit rating agencies.
(2) The investment authority provided by subsection (1) of this section shall be subject
to the following limitations:
(a) The amount of money invested at any time by a local government or political
subdivision in any one (1) of the categories of investments authorized by
subsection (1)(e), (f), (g), (k), and (l) of this section shall not exceed twenty
percent (20%) of the total amount of money invested by the local government;
(b) The amount of money invested at any one (1) time by a local government or a
Page 3 of 17
XXXX 1/13/2026 4:18 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1394
political subdivision in the categories of investments authorized in subsection
(1)(j), (k), and (l) of this section shall not, aggregately, exceed forty percent
(40%) of the total money invested unless the investment is in a mutual fund
consisting solely of the investments authorized under subsection (1)(a), (b),
(c), (h), or (i) of this section, or any combination thereof;
(c) No local government or political subdivision shall purchase any investment
authorized by subsection (1) of this section on a margin basis or through the
use of any similar leveraging technique; and
(d) At the time the investment is made, no more than five percent (5%) of the
total amount of money invested by the local governments or political
subdivisions shall be invested in any one (1) issuer unless:
1. The issuer is the United States government or an agency or
instrumentality of the United States government, or an entity which has
its obligations guaranteed by either the United States government or an
entity, agency, or instrumentality of the United States government;
2. The money is invested in a certificate of deposit or other interest-bearing
accounts as authorized by subsection (1)(d) and (e) of this section;
3. The money is invested in bonds or certificates of indebtedness of this
state and its agencies and instrumentalities as authorized in subsection
(1)(h) of this section; or
4. The money is invested in securities issued by a state or local
government, or any instrumentality or agency thereof, in the United
States as authorized in subsection (1)(i) of this section.
(3) The governing body of every local government or political subdivision that invests
or reinvests money subject to its control or jurisdiction according to the provisions
of subsection (1) of this section shall by January 1, 1995, adopt a written investment
policy that shall govern the investment of funds by the local government or political
Page 4 of 17
XXXX 1/13/2026 4:18 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1394
subdivision. The written investment policy shall include but shall not be limited to
the following:
(a) A designation of the officer or officers of the local government or political
subdivision who are authorized to invest and oversee the investment of funds;
(b) A list of the permitted types of investments;
(c) Procedures designed to secure the local government's or political subdivision's
financial interest in the investments;
(d) Standards for written agreements pursuant to which investments are to be
made;
(e) Procedures for monitoring, control, deposit, and retention of investments and
collateral;
(f) Standards for the diversification of investments, including diversification with
respect to the types of investments and firms with whom the local government
or political subdivision transacts business;
(g) Standards for the qualification of investment agents which transact business
with the local government, such as criteria covering creditworthiness,
experience, capitalization, size, and any other factors that make a firm capable
and qualified to transact business with the local government or political
subdivision; and
(h) Requirements for periodic reporting to the governing body on the status of
invested funds.
(4) Sheriffs, county clerks, county attorneys, and jailers, who for the purposes of this
section shall be known as county officials, may invest and reinvest money subject
to their control and jurisdiction, including tax dollars subject to the provisions of
KRS Chapter 134 and 160.510, as permitted by this section.
(5) The provisions of this section are not intended to impair the power of a county
official, city, county, urban-county, charter county, school district, or other local
Page 5 of 17
XXXX 1/13/2026 4:18 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1394
governmental unit or political subdivision to hold funds in deposit accounts with
financial[banking] institutions as otherwise authorized by law.
(6) The governing body or county official may delegate the investment authority
provided by this section to the treasurer or other financial officer or officers charged
with custody of the funds of the local government, and the officer or officers shall
thereafter assume full responsibility for all investment transactions until the
delegation of authority terminates or is revoked.
(7) All county officials shall report the earnings of any investments at the time of their
annual reports and settlements with the fiscal courts for excess income of their
offices.
(8) The state local debt officer is authorized and directed to assist county officials and
local governments, except school districts, in investing funds that are temporarily in
excess of operating needs by:
(a) Explaining investment opportunities to county officials and local governments
through publication and other appropriate means; and
(b) Providing technical assistance in investment of idle funds to county officials
and local governments that request that assistance.
(9) (a) The state local debt officer may create an investment pool for local
governments, except school districts, and county officials; and counties and
county officials and cities may associate to create an investment pool. If
counties and county officials and cities create a pool, each group may select a
manager to administer their pool and invest the assets. Each county and each
county official and each city may invest in a pool created pursuant to this
subsection. Investments shall be limited to those investment instruments
permitted by this section. The funds of each local government and county
official shall be properly accounted for, and earnings and charges shall be
assigned to each participant in a uniform manner according to the amount
Page 6 of 17
XXXX 1/13/2026 4:18 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1394
invested. Charges to any local government or county official shall not exceed
one percent (1%) annually on the principal amount invested, and charges on
investments of less than a year's duration shall be prorated. Any investment
pool created pursuant to this subsection shall be audited each year by an
independent certified public accountant, or by the Auditor of Public Accounts.
A copy of the audit report shall be provided to each local government or
county official participating in the pool. In the case of an audit by an
independent certified public accountant, a copy of the audit report shall be
provided to the Auditor of Public Accounts, and to the state local debt officer.
The Auditor of Public Accounts may review the report of the independent
certified public accountant. After preliminary review, should discrepancies be
found, the Auditor of Public Accounts may make his or her own investigative
report or audit to verify the findings of the independent certified public
accountant's report.
(b) If the state local debt officer creates an investment pool, he or she shall
establish an account in the Treasury for the pool. He or she shall also establish
a separate trust and agency account for the purpose of covering management
costs, and he or she shall deposit management charges in this account. The
state local debt officer may promulgate administrative regulations, pursuant to
KRS Chapter 13A, governing the operation of the investment pool, including
but not limited to provisions on minimum allowable investments and
investment periods, and method and timing of investments, withdrawals,
payment of earnings, and assignment of charges.
(c) Before investing in an investment pool created pursuant to this subsection, a
local government or county official shall allow any [savings and loan
association or ]bank, savings and loan association, or credit union in the
county, as described in subsection (1)(d) of this section, to bid for the
Page 7 of 17
XXXX 1/13/2026 4:18 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1394
deposits, but the local government or county official shall not be required to
seek bids more often than once in each six (6) month period.
(10) (a) With the approval of the Kentucky Board of Education, local boards of
education, or any of them that desire to do so, may associate to create an
investment pool. Each local school board which associates itself with other
local school boards for the purpose of creating the investment pool may invest
its funds in the pool so created and so managed. Investments shall be limited
to those investment instruments permitted by this section. The funds of each
local school board shall be properly accounted for, and earnings and charges
shall be assigned to each participant in a uniform manner according to the
amount invested. Charges to any local school board shall not exceed one
percent (1%) annually on the principal amount invested, and charges on
investments of less than a year's duration shall be prorated. Any investment
pool created pursuant to this subsection shall be audited each year by an
independent certified public accountant, or by the Auditor of Public Accounts.
A copy of the audit report shall be provided to each local school board
participating in the pool. In the case of an audit by an independent certified
public accountant, a copy of the audit report shall be provided to the Auditor
of Public Accounts, and to the Kentucky Board of Education. The Auditor of
Public Accounts may review the report of the independent certified public
accountant. After preliminary review, should discrepancies be found, the
Auditor of Public Accounts may make his or her own investigative report or
audit to verify the findings of the independent certified public accountant's
report.
(b) The Kentucky Board of Education may promulgate administrative regulations
governing the operation of the investment pool including but not limited to
provisions on minimum allowable investments and investment periods, and
Page 8 of 17
XXXX 1/13/2026 4:18 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1394
methods and timing of investments, withdrawals, payment of earnings, and
assignment of charges.
(11) As used in this section, "competent rating agency" means a rating agency certified
or approved by a national entity that engages in such a process. The certification or
approval process shall include but not necessarily be limited to the following
elements the subject rating agency must possess:
(a) A requirement for the rating agency to register and provide an annual updated
filing;
(b) Record retention requirements;
(c) Financial reporting requirements;
(d) Policies for the prevention of misuse of material nonpublic information;
(e) Policies addressing management of conflicts of interest, including prohibited
conflicts;
(f) Prohibited acts practices;
(g) Disclosure requirements;
(h) Any policies, practices, and internal controls required by the national entity;
and
(i) Standards of training, experience, and competence for credit analysts.
Section 2. KRS 41.010 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in KRS 41.070, 41.110, 41.120, 41.130, 41.280, 41.290, or 41.300, unless
the context requires otherwise, the terms "appropriation," "budget unit,"
"disbursements," "expenditures," "expenses," and "receipts" have the meaning
given them by KRS 43.010 and 48.010.
(2) As used in this chapter:
(a) "Administrative body" includes an authority, board, bureau, interstate
compact, commission, committee, conference, council, or any other form of
organization in the executive branch of state government, but does not include
Page 9 of 17
XXXX 1/13/2026 4:18 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1394
office, department, program cabinet, or division;
(b) "Agency" means any state administrative body, program cabinet, office,
department, or division;
(c) "Assistant" means assistant treasurer;
(d) "Bank or credit union" includes any bank, [or ]savings and loan association,
or credit union:
1. Chartered by the State of Kentucky or the United States government;
and
2. Designated to take custody of state funds on deposit, for periods greater
than overnight, with the intent to honor presentments against those
deposits;
(e) "Check," unless the context requires otherwise, means either a paper check or
a paperless entry on an electronic data processing medium that substitutes for
a paper check and of which a permanent record is made for purposes of
debiting or crediting an account;
(f) "Collateral" means the listed securities and other obligations in KRS
41.240(4);
(g) "Form" or "report" means any written method of transporting data;
(h) "Secretary" means the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet;
(i) "State depository" means any bank or credit union designated to take custody
of state funds on deposit pursuant to KRS 41.220;
(j) "Warrant" means a printed or electronic authorization from the Finance and
Administration Cabinet for the Treasurer to issue a check; and
(k) "Writing" or "written" means letters, words, or numbers, or their equivalent,
set down by handwriting, typewriting, printing, photostating, photographing,
magnetic impulse, mechanical or electronic recording, or other form of data
compilation.
Page 10 of 17
XXXX 1/13/2026 4:18 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1394
Section 3. KRS 41.070 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Unless otherwise expressly provided by law, no receipts from any source of state
money or money for which the state is responsible shall be held, used, or deposited
in any personal or special bank or credit union account, temporarily or otherwise,
by any agent or employee of any budget unit, to meet expenditures or for any other
purpose.
(2) All receipts of any character of any budget unit, all revenue collected for the state,
and all public money and dues to the state shall be deposited in state depositories in
the most prompt and cost-efficient manner available. However in the case of state
departments or agencies located outside Frankfort, and all state institutions, the
Finance and Administration Cabinet may permit temporary deposits to be made to
the accounts maintained by the agency, department, or institution in a state
depository for a period not to exceed thirty (30) days, and may require that the
money be forwarded to the State Treasury at the time and in the manner and form
prescribed by the cabinet. Nothing in this section shall be construed as authorizing
any representative of any agency, department, or institution to enforce or cash, even
for the purpose of a deposit, any check or other instrument of value payable to the
Commonwealth or any agency thereof.
(3) Each agency depositing its receipts directly with the State Treasurer shall do so in
the manner approved by the State Treasurer as agent in charge of public fund
deposits.
(4) The Department of Revenue may deposit receipts to the credit of the State Treasury
directly with a state depository utilized by the Commonwealth for its primary
deposit[banking] services. The State Treasurer, with the approval of the Finance
and Administration Cabinet, may authorize other agencies to deposit receipts
directly with a state depository to the credit of the State Treasury if the Treasurer
prescribes the manner in which the deposit is to be made, and the forms and reports
Page 11 of 17
XXXX 1/13/2026 4:18 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1394
to be filed with the Treasury Department. The Finance and Administration Cabinet
shall prescribe the forms and reports to be filed with it when this type of deposit is
made.
(5) Each department, agency, or other budget unit which receives funds to be deposited
into the State Treasury shall maintain records to report adequately each amount
received, from whom received, and date received. Agency records shall be easily
reconcilable with the information forwarded to the State Treasurer.
Section 4. KRS 41.220 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Not less than three (3) solvent banks or credit unions shall be designated as state
depositories for state funds. Each bank or credit union designated shall have not
less than the minimum capital[ stock] as required by the primary state or federal
regulator of the bank or credit union. A bank or credit union[ Banks] shall be
designated as a state depository[depositories] for state funds upon agreement of the
State Treasurer and the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet. Those
banks or credit unions designated shall be entered in the executive journal. If at any
time it appears that the capital of any state depository has become impaired, the
state's deposits shall be withdrawn and deposited with another state depository.
(2) The State Treasurer and the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet
shall determine the needs for moving state funds from one (1) designated depository
to another.
(3) If no banks or credit unions are designated as state depositories in accordance with
this section, all banks or credit unions[ as defined in KRS 41.010] shall be
considered eligible state depositories.
Section 5. KRS 41.240 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) Before any bank or credit union is[ shall be] named as a state depository to
receive public funds, it shall either pledge or provide to the State Treasurer
collateral having an aggregate current face value or current quoted market
Page 12 of 17
XXXX 1/13/2026 4:18 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1394
value at least equal to the deposits as of the last business day of each quarter
in which funds are so deposited or provide to the State Treasurer a surety
bond or surety bonds in favor of the State Treasurer in an amount at least
equal to the deposits, as of the last business day of each quarter in which
funds are deposited; except any[ provided, however, that] amounts insured by
the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or the [Federal Savings and Loan
Insurance Corporation]National Credit Union Administration need not be so
collateralized. The president or an executive officer of each state depository
shall submit to the Treasurer and the State Investment Commission a
statement subscribed and sworn to by the president or executive officer
showing:
1. The face value or current quoted market value of the securities or other
obligations pledged as collateral; and
2. The value of surety bonds provided as of the time such surety bonds are
provided as collateral.
The aggregate valuation of all pledged or provided collateral shall be reported
to the State Treasurer and State Investment Commission by the state
depository within ten (10) days of the close of each quarter after the date of
deposit. Such value with respect to pledged collateral other than surety bonds
shall be as of the end of the quarter or the preceding business day and, as to
surety bonds, the market values shall be obtained from a reputable bond-
pricing service. The State Treasurer and Governor may from time to time call
for additional collateral to adequately secure the deposits as aggregate face or
current market values may require, if the value of collateral is not compliant
with state law as of the report date.
(b) No deposit of state funds shall collectively exceed at any time the state
depository's sum of capital, reserves, undivided profits and surplus or ten
Page 13 of 17
XXXX 1/13/2026 4:18 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1394
percent (10%) of the total deposits of the state depository, whichever is less.
For purposes of this subsection only, the value of the state deposit will be
determined as of the end of the last business day of each quarter that funds are
deposited.
(2) (a) As an alternative to subsection (1)(a) of this section, a state depository insured
by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or the National Credit Union
Administration may either pledge to the State Treasurer, as collateral,
securities, real property, or other obligations having an aggregate face value
or a current quoted market value or provide to the State Treasurer a surety
bond or surety bonds in an amount equal to eighty percent (80%) of the value
of the state deposit including demand and time accounts, if the state
depository is determined by the State Investment Commission to have very
strong credit with little or no credit risk at any maturity level and the
likelihood of short-term unexpected problems of significance is minimal or
not of a serious or long-term nature. The value of the state deposit will be
determined at the end of the business day of deposit and as of the end of
business on the last day of each quarter that funds are so deposited.
(b) Valuation of all pledged or provided collateral shall be reported to the State
Treasurer and the State Investment Commission within ten (10) days of the
close of each quarter after the date of deposit.
(c) State depositories designated as qualified for reduced pledging shall be so
recorded in the executive journal.
(d) The State Investment Commission shall determine eligibility for the reduced
pledging option based on totally objective and quantifiable measures of
financial intermediary performance. The information for such eligibility shall
be obtained from publicly available documents. The State Investment
Commission shall promulgate the particular criteria of eligibility by
Page 14 of 17
XXXX 1/13/2026 4:18 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1394
regulations issued pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A.
(3) State depositories which do not qualify or do not choose to qualify under subsection
(1) or (2) of this section shall not receive state deposits in excess of amounts that
are insured by an instrumentality of the United States.
(4) Only the following securities and other obligations may be accepted by the State
Treasurer as collateral under this section:
(a) Bonds, notes, letters of credit, or other obligations of or issued or guaranteed
by the United States, or those for which the credit of the United States is
pledged for the payment of the principal and interest thereof, and any bonds,
notes, debentures, letters of credit, or any other obligations issued or
guaranteed by any federal governmental agency or instrumentality, presently
or in the future established by an Act of Congress, as amended or
supplemented from time to time, including, without limitation, the United
States government corporations listed in KRS 66.480(1)(c);
(b) Obligations of the Commonwealth of Kentucky including revenue bonds
issued by its statutory authorities, commissions, or agencies;
(c) Revenue bonds issued by educational institutions of the Commonwealth of
Kentucky as authorized by KRS 162.340 to 162.380;
(d) Obligations of any city of the Commonwealth of Kentucky, or any county, for
the payment of principal and interest on which the full faith and credit of the
issuing body is pledged;
(e) School improvement bonds issued in accordance with the authority granted
under KRS 162.080 to 162.100;
(f) School building revenue bonds issued in accordance with the authority
granted under KRS 162.120 to 162.300, provided that the issuance of such
bonds is approved by the Kentucky Board of Education;
(g) Surety bonds issued by sureties rated in one (1) of the three (3) highest
Page 15 of 17
XXXX 1/13/2026 4:18 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1394
categories by a nationally recognized rating agency;
(h) Letters of credit issued by federal home loan banks; and
(i) Real property owned by the bank or credit union.
Section 6. KRS 41.250 is amended to read as follows:
The execution of the bond or the pledge of the warrants or bonds required by KRS 41.240
shall not diminish the liability of the Treasurer and his or her sureties upon his or her
bond, nor impair or delay the right of the state to recover on the Treasurer's bond for any
loss or misapplication of the public funds or other delinquency in office, nor impair or
delay the right of the state to recover from any delinquent or defaulting bank or credit
union, or the officers or stockholders thereof, in the same manner as other depositors.
Section 7. KRS 41.300 is amended to read as follows:
There shall be a special deposit fund consisting of all money received by the state or any
department or officer thereof as guarantees for the payment of any costs, charges or
damages accruing or liable to accrue to the state or for the performance of any specific
act, including all money deposited as bail to secure the liberation of persons accused of
public offenses, all money deposited by bidders on contracts to insure their entering into
contracts awarded them, and all money deposited to indemnify persons whose property
may be damaged or destroyed by the operations of the depositor. All such money shall be
paid to the Treasurer, in the manner provided for the deposit of public money, and shall
be deposited by the Treasurer as a trust fund in a separate account in a designated state
depository. The money so deposited may be returned to the depositor, if he becomes
entitled to its return, without specific appropriation, allotment or authorization for
expenditure therefor, in the same manner as other claims against the state may be paid, or
may, upon default of any depositor and upon certificate to such effect by the
administrative officer having charge of the matter, be declared by the Finance and
Administration Cabinet to be forfeited in whole or in part and thereupon be transferred to
the extent so forfeited to the general fund. The interest on bank or credit union deposits
Page 16 of 17
XXXX 1/13/2026 4:18 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1394
of this fund shall accrue to the general fund.
Section 8. KRS 30A.120 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Every clerk shall collect all fines and forfeitures imposed in District and Circuit
Court, and shall issue receipts therefor.
(2) At the close of business daily the clerk in each county shall deposit in a bank or
credit union designated as a state depository the proceeds from fines and
forfeitures, and within three (3) working days after the first and fifteenth of each
month submit to the Finance and Administration Cabinet a report listing all fines
and forfeitures collected, and shall pay over to the cabinet in the manner prescribed
by the cabinet at the same time all costs, fines, forfeitures, and other moneys so
reported.
(3) Upon the failure of the clerk to submit to the cabinet, within the prescribed period,
the required report and to pay over, at the same time, the costs, fines, forfeitures and
other moneys collected, the cabinet shall immediately notify the Auditor of Public
Accounts that the clerk concerned is delinquent in the matter.
Section 9. KRS 30A.200 is amended to read as follows:
All moneys which are deposited with the clerk and which are payable to a third person,
not the Commonwealth, or which may become payable to such third person as a result of
court action or otherwise shall:
(1) Be logged in the appropriate record of the clerk and the person paying or depositing
the money shall be given a receipt;
(2) Be deposited daily in a bank or credit union approved as a state depository[ bank]
in a special escrow account or accounts subject to the clerk's withdrawal as required
in the daily course of the clerk's business or as may be ordered by a court; and
(3) Not be subject to the provisions of KRS Chapter 41 relating to the deposit of money
in the State Treasury until by action of a court, such as forfeiture of a bond, the
money is due and owing to the Commonwealth.
Page 17 of 17
XXXX 1/13/2026 4:18 PM Jacketed